Utah statutes.
4-3-3.   Authority in local jurisdictions to regulate dairy products -- Department standards to govern -- Department evaluation permitted -- Local notice to cease inspection.

While nothing in this chapter shall impair the authority of any town, city, or county to regulate the production, handling, storage, distribution, or sale of dairy products, frozen dairy products, grade A milk, grade A milk products, or milk, within their respective jurisdictions, a common standard as prescribed by the department shall be followed in such jurisdictions.

If a town, city, or county elects to enforce this chapter, the department shall accept its findings relative to inspections in lieu of making its own inspections, but the department may evaluate the effectiveness of any local inspection program. If a town, city, or county intends to cease making inspections under this chapter, it shall notify the department of its intent to cease inspection at least one year in advance of the actual cessation of inspection.

Upon request, the commissioner shall cooperate with other state agencies, towns, cities, counties, and federal authorities in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

